Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-153] Larceny and wrongful
appropriation. (a) Any person subject to this chapter who wrongfully
takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or
of any other person any money, personal property, or article of value of any
kind:

(1) With intent permanently to deprive or defraud
another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to the
person's own use or the use of any person other than the owner, steals that
property and is guilty of larceny; or

(2) With intent temporarily to deprive or defraud
another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to the
person's own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of
wrongful appropriation.

(b) Any person found guilty of larceny or
wrongful appropriation shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next